North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s designated beneficiary or beneficiaries, or surviving spouse if there is no surviving beneficiary, or legal
representative if not survived by a designated beneficiary or spouse, shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

( l 1) Reciprocity of Death Benefit Plan. — Only for the purpose of determining eligibility for the death benefit provided for in subsection (

l
) of this section, membership service standing to the credit of a member of the Legislative Retirement System or the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System shall be added to the membership
service standing to the credit of a member of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System. However, in the event that a participant or beneficiary is a retired member of the Legislative Retirement System
or the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System whose retirement benefit was suspended upon entrance into membership in the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, such membership service standing to
the credit of the retired member prior to retirement shall be likewise counted. Membership service under this section shall not be counted twice for the same period of time. In no event shall a death benefit
provided for in

G.S. 135-5

(

l
) be paid if a death benefit is paid under

G.S. 135-6

3.

Survivor’s Alternate Benefit. — Upon the death of a member in service, the beneficiary designated to receive a return of accumulated contributions shall have the right to elect to receive in lieu thereof the reduced retirement allowance provided by Option
2 of subsection (g) above computed by assuming that the member had retired on the first day of the month following the date of the member’s death, provided that all four of the following conditions apply:

The member had attained such age and/or creditable service to be eligible to commence retirement with an early or service retirement allowance, or

The member had obtained 20 years of creditable service in which case the retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with G.S. 135-5(b21)(1)c. or G.S. 135-5(b21)(2)c., notwithstanding the requirement of obtaining age 50, or

b1. The member was a law enforcement officer who had obtained 15 years of service as a law enforcement officer and was killed in the line of duty, in which case the retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with G.S. 135-5(b21)(1)c., notwithstanding
the requirement of obtaining age 50.

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-72, s. 2(a), effective July 1, 2010.

At the time of the member’s death, one and only one beneficiary is eligible to receive a return of his accumulated contributions.

The member had not instructed the Board of Trustees in writing that he did not wish the provisions of this subsection to apply.

The member had not commenced to receive a retirement allowance as provided under this Chapter.For the purpose of this benefit, a member is considered to be in service at the date of his death if his death occurs within 180 days from the last day of his
actual service. The last day of actual service shall be determined as provided in subsection (l) of this section. Upon the death of a member in service, the surviving spouse may make all purchases for creditable service
as provided for under this Chapter for which the member had made application in writing prior to the date of death, provided that the date of death occurred prior to or within 60 days after notification of the cost to make
the purchase. The term “in service” as used in this subsection includes a member in receipt of a benefit under the Disability Income Plan as provided in Article 6 of this Chapter.Notwithstanding the foregoing, a member
who is in receipt of Workers’ Compensation during the period for which the member would have otherwise been eligible to receive short-term benefits, as provided in

G.S. 135-105

, and who dies on or after 181 days from the last day of the member’s actual service but on or before the date the benefits as provided in

G.S. 135-105

would have ended, shall be considered in service at the time of the member’s death for the purpose of this benefit.For the purpose of calculating this benefit any terminal payouts made after the date of
death that meet the definition of compensation shall be credited to the month prior to the month of death. These terminal payouts do not include salary or wages paid for work performed during the month of death.

(m1) Special Retirement Allowance for Law Enforcement Officers. — Upon retirement, a member who is a law enforcement officer vested as of June 30, 2010, may elect to transfer any portion of his eligible accumulated contributions, not including any Roth
after-tax contributions and the earnings thereon, from the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan of North Carolina to this Retirement System and receive, in addition to his basic service, early or disability retirement
allowance, a special retirement allowance which shall be based upon his eligible accumulated account balance at the date of the transfer of the assets to this System. For the purpose of determining the special retirement
allowance, the Board of Trustees shall adopt straight life annuity factors on the basis of mortality tables, such other tables as may be necessary and the interest assumption rate recommended by the actuary based upon
actual experience including an assumed annual post-retirement allowance increase of four percent (4%). The Board of Trustees shall modify such factors every five years, as shall be deemed necessary, based upon the five
year experience study as required by G.S. 135-6(n). Provided, however, a member, who transfers his eligible accumulated contributions from the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan of North Carolina, shall be taxed for
North Carolina State Income tax purposes on the special retirement allowance the same as if that special retirement allowance had been paid directly by the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan of North Carolina. The
Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System shall be responsible to determine the taxable amount, if any, and report accordingly.

(m2) Special Retirement Allowance. — At any time coincident with or following retirement, a member may make a one-time, irrevocable election to transfer any portion of the member’s eligible accumulated contributions, not including any Roth after-tax contributions
and the earnings thereon, from the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan of North Carolina or the North Carolina Public Employee Deferred Compensation Plan to this Retirement System and receive, in addition to the member’s
basic service, early or disability retirement allowance, a special retirement allowance which shall be based upon the member’s transferred balance.A member who became a member of the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan
prior to retirement and who remains a member of the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan may make a one-time, irrevocable election to transfer eligible balances, not including any Roth after-tax contributions and the
earnings thereon, from any of the following plans to the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan, subject to the applicable requirements of the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan, and then through the Supplemental Retirement
Income Plan to this Retirement System: (i) a plan participating in the North Carolina Public School Teachers’ and Professional Educators’ Investment Plan; (ii) a plan described in section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue
Code; (iii) a plan described in section 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code that is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a
state; (iv) an individual retirement account or annuity described in section 408(a) or section 408(b) of the Internal Revenue Code that is eligible to be rolled over and would otherwise be includible in gross income;
or (v) a tax-qualified plan described in section 401(a) or section 403(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. In addition, any transfer under this subsection may be paid in whole or in part with employer contributions paid
directly to this Retirement System at the time of transfer.Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, a member may not transfer such amounts as will cause the member’s retirement allowance under the System to exceed
the amount allowable under G.S. 135-18.7(b). The Board of Trustees may establish a minimum amount that must be transferred if a transfer is elected. The member may elect a special retirement allowance with no postretirement
increases or a special retirement allowance with annual postretirement increases equal to the annual increase in the U.S. Consumer Price Index. Postretirement increases on any other allowance will not apply to the special
retirement allowance. The Board of Trustees shall provide educational materials to the members who apply for the transfer authorized by this section. Those materials shall describe the special retirement allowance and
shall explain the relationship between the transferred balance and the monthly benefit and how the member’s heirs may be impacted by the election to make this transfer and any costs and fees involved.For the purpose
of determining the special retirement allowance, the Board of Trustees shall adopt straight life annuity factors on the basis of yields on U.S. Treasury Bonds and mortality and such other tables as may be necessary
based upon actual experience. A single set of mortality and such other tables will be used for all members, with factors differing only based on the age of the member and the election of postretirement increases. The
Board of Trustees shall modify the mortality and such other tables every five years, as shall be deemed necessary, based upon the five-year experience study as required by G.S. 135-6(n). Provided, however, a member
who transfers the member’s eligible accumulated contributions from an eligible retirement plan pursuant to this subsection to this Retirement System shall be taxed for North Carolina State Income Tax purposes on the
special retirement allowance the same as if that special retirement allowance had been paid directly by the eligible plan or the plan through which the transfer was made, whichever is most favorable to the member. The
Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System shall be responsible to determine the taxable amount, if any, and report accordingly.The Supplemental Retirement Board of Trustees established under

G.S. 135-96

may assess a one-time flat administrative fee not to exceed the actual cost of the administrative expenses relating to these transfers. An eligible plan shall not assess a fee specifically relating
to a transfer of accumulated contributions authorized under this subsection. This provision shall not prohibit other fees that may be assessable under the plan. Each plan, contract, account, or annuity shall fully disclose
to any member participating in a transfer under this subsection any surrender charges or other fees, and such disclosure shall be made contemporaneous with the initiation of the transfer by the member.The special retirement
allowance shall continue for the life of the member and the beneficiary designated to receive a monthly survivorship benefit under Option 2, 3 or 6 as provided in G.S. 135-5(g), if any. The Board of Trustees, however,
shall establish two payment options that guarantee payments as follows:

(1) A member may elect to receive the special retirement allowance for life but with payments guaranteed for a number of months to be specified by the Board of Trustees. Under this plan, if the member dies before the expiration of the specified number
of months, the special retirement allowance will continue to be paid to the member’s designated beneficiary for the life of the beneficiary, if Option 2, 3 or 6 is selected. If the member’s designated beneficiary under
Option 2, 3 or 6 begins receiving monthly payments and dies before the specified number of monthly payments have been made in combination to the member and beneficiary, a one-time payment will be paid to the member’s
legal representatives equal to the initial monthly special retirement allowance, multiplied by the specified number of months, less the total of the monthly payments made to the member and beneficiary. If Option 2,
3 or 6 is not selected, and the member dies before the expiration of the specified number of months, the member’s designated beneficiary will receive a one-time payment equal to the initial monthly special retirement
allowance, multiplied by the specified number of months, less the total of the monthly payments made to the member.

(2) A member may elect to receive the special retirement allowance for life but is guaranteed that the sum of the special allowance payments will equal the total of the transferred amount. Under this payment option, if the member dies before receiving
the total transferred amount, the special retirement allowance will continue to be paid to the member’s designated beneficiary for the life of the beneficiary, if Option 2, 3 or 6 is selected. If Option 2, 3 or 6 is
not selected, the member’s designated beneficiary or the member’s estate shall be paid any remaining balance of the transferred amount.The General Assembly reserves the right to repeal or amend this subsection, but
such repeal or amendment shall not affect any person who has already made the one-time election provided in this subsection.

(m3) Repealed by Session Laws 2014-88, s. 3(g), effective July 30, 2014.

(m4) A member who has contributions in this System and is not eligible for a retirement benefit as set forth in G.S. 135-5(a) shall be paid his or her contributions in a lump sum as provided in G.S. 135-5(f) by April 1 of the calendar year following the
later of the calendar year in which the member (i) attains 72 years of age or (ii) has ceased to be a teacher or State employee except by death. If the member fails, following reasonable notification, to complete a
refund application by the required date, then the requirement that a refund application be completed shall be waived and the refund shall be paid without a refund application as a single lump-sum payment with applicable
required North Carolina and federal income taxes withheld.A member who has contributions in this System and is eligible for a retirement benefit as set forth in G.S. 135-5(a) shall begin to receive a monthly benefit
no later than April 1 of the calendar year following the later of the calendar year in which the member (i) attains 72 years of age or (ii) has ceased to be a teacher or State employee except by death. If the member
fails, following reasonable notification, to complete the retirement process as set forth under Chapter 135 of the General Statutes by such required beginning date, then the requirement that a retirement application
and an election of payment plan form be completed shall be waived and the retirement allowance shall be paid as a single life annuity. The single life annuity shall be calculated and processed in accordance with this
section.For purposes of this subsection, a member shall not be considered to have ceased to be a teacher or State employee if the member is actively contributing to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, Local
Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, or Legislative Retirement System. A retirement benefit or lump-sum refund shall not be paid under this subsection if the member is actively contributing to the Consolidated
Judicial Retirement System, Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, or Legislative Retirement System.

No action shall be commenced against the State or the Retirement System by any retired member or beneficiary respecting any deficiency in the payment of benefits more than three years after such deficient payment was made, and no action shall be commenced
by the State or the Retirement System against any retired member or former member or beneficiary respecting any overpayment of benefits or contributions more than three years after such overpayment was made. This subsection does
not affect the right of the Retirement System to recoup overpaid benefits as provided in

G.S. 135-9

.

Post-Retirement Increases in Allowances. — As of December 31, 1969, the ratio of the Consumer Price Index to such index one year earlier shall be determined. If such ratio indicates an increase that equals or exceeds three per centum (3%), each beneficiary
receiving a retirement allowance as of December 31, 1968, shall be entitled to have his allowance increased three per centum (3%) effective July 1, 1970.As of December 31, 1970, the ratio of the Consumer Price Index to such index
one year earlier shall be determined. If such ratio indicates an increase of at least one per centum (1%), each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1970, shall be entitled to have his allowance increased effective
July 1, 1971 as follows:

Click to viewAs of December 31, 1971, an increase in retirement allowances shall be calculated and made effective July 1, 1972, in the manner described in the preceding paragraph. As of December 31 of each year after 1971, the ratio (R) of the Consumer
Price Index to such index one year earlier shall be determined, and each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1 of the year of determination shall be entitled to have his allowance increased effective on July 1 of
the year following the year of determination by the same percentage of increase indicated by the ratio (R) calculated to the nearest tenth of one per centum, but not more than four per centum (4%); provided that any such increase
in allowances shall become effective only if the additional liabilities on account of such increase do not require an increase in the total employer rate of contributions.The allowance of a surviving annuitant of a beneficiary
whose allowance is increased under this subsection shall, when and if payable, be increased by the same per centum.Any increase in allowance granted hereunder shall be permanent, irrespective of any subsequent decrease in the
Consumer Price Index, and shall be included in determining any subsequent increase.For purposes of this subsection, Consumer Price Index shall mean the Consumer Price Index (all items — United States city average), as published
by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.Notwithstanding the above paragraphs, retired members and beneficiaries may receive cost-of-living increases in retirement allowances if active members of
the system receive across-the-board cost-of-living salary increases. Such increases in post-retirement allowances shall be comparable to cost-of-living salary increases for active members in light of the differences between
the statutory payroll deductions for State retirement contributions, Social Security taxes, State income withholding taxes, and federal income withholding taxes required of each group. The increases for retired members shall
include the cost-of-living increases provided in this section. The cost-of-living increases allowed retired and active members of the system shall be comparable when each group receives an increase that has the same relative
impact upon the net disposable income of each group.

Increases in Benefits Paid in Respect to Members Retired prior to July 1, 1967. — From and after July 1, 1971, the monthly benefits to or on account of persons who commenced receiving benefits prior to July 1, 1963, shall be increased by twenty percent
(20%) thereof; the monthly benefits to or on account of persons who commenced receiving benefits after June 30, 1963 and before July 1, 1967, shall be increased by five percent (5%) thereof. These increases shall be calculated
after monthly retirement allowances as of July 1, 1971, have been increased to the extent provided for in the preceding subsection (o).

Increases in Benefits to Those Persons Who Were Retired prior to January 1, 1970. —

From and after July 1, 1973, the monthly benefits to or on account of persons who commenced receiving benefits from the System prior to January 1, 1970, shall be increased by a percentage thereof. Such percentage shall be determined in accordance with
the following schedule:

Click to viewThese increases shall be calculated after monthly retirement allowances as of July 1, 1973, have been increased to the extent provided for in the preceding subsection (o).

Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, for persons who commenced receiving benefits from the System prior to January 1, 1970, effective July 1, 1973, any member who retired after attaining the age of 60 with 15 or more years of creditable service
shall receive a monthly benefit of no less than seventy-five dollars ($75.00) prior to the application of any optional benefit.

Increases in Benefits to Those Persons on Disability Retirement Who Were Retired prior to July 1, 1971. — From and after July 1, 1974, the monthly benefits to members who commenced receiving disability benefits prior to July 1, 1963, shall be increased
by one percent (1%) thereof for each year by which the member retired prior to the age of 65 years; the monthly benefits to members who commenced receiving disability benefits after June 30, 1963, and before July 1, 1971, shall
be increased by five percent (5%) thereof. These increases shall be calculated before monthly retirement allowances as of June 30, 1974, have been increased to the extent provided for in the preceding subsection (o).

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions, the increase in allowance to each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1973, which shall become effective on July 1, 1974, as otherwise provided in G.S. 135-5(o), shall be the current maximum
four percent (4%) plus an additional two percent (2%) to a total of six percent (6%) for the year 1974 only. The provisions of this subsection shall apply also to the allowance of a surviving annuitant of a beneficiary.

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 875, s. 47.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions, the increase in allowance to each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1974, which shall become payable on July 1, 1975, and to each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1975,
which shall become payable on July 1, 1976, as otherwise provided in G.S. 135-5(o), shall be the current maximum four percent (4%) plus an additional four percent (4%) to a total of eight percent (8%) for the years 1975 and 1976
only, provided that the increases do not exceed the actual percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index as determined in G.S. 135-5(o). The provisions of this subsection shall apply also to the allowance of a surviving annuitant
of a beneficiary.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the increase in the allowance to each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as otherwise provided in G.S. 135-5(o) shall be the current maximum of four per centum (4%) plus an additional four per centum
(4%) to a total of eight per centum (8%) on July 1, 1975, and July 1, 1976, provided the increases do not exceed the actual percentage increase in the cost of living as determined in G.S. 135-5(o). The provisions of this subsection
shall apply also to the allowance of a surviving annuitant of a beneficiary. The cost of these increases shall be borne from the funds of the Retirement System unless the 1975 Session of the General Assembly provides an appropriation
to fund this provision.

Increases in Benefits to Those Persons on Disability Retirement Who Were Retired prior to July 1, 1971. — From and after July 1, 1975, the monthly benefits to members who commenced receiving disability benefits prior to July 1, 1963, shall be increased
one percent (1%) thereof for each year by which the member retired prior to age 65 years; the monthly benefits to members who commenced receiving disability benefits after June 30, 1963, and before July 1, 1971, shall be increased
by five percent (5%) thereof. These increases shall be calculated before monthly retirement allowances as of June 30, 1975, have been increased to the extent provided in the preceding provisions of this Chapter.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, the increase in allowance to each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1976, which shall become payable on July 1, 1977, and to each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1977, which shall
become payable on July 1, 1978, as otherwise provided in G.S. 135-5(o), shall be the current maximum four percent (4%) plus an additional two and one-half percent (21/2%) for the years beginning July 1, 1977, and July 1, 1978.
The provisions of this subsection shall apply also to the allowance of a surviving annuitant of a beneficiary.

Increases in Benefits Paid in Respect to Members Retired prior to July 1, 1975. — From and after July 1, 1977, the monthly benefits to or on account of persons who commenced receiving benefits prior to July 1, 1975, shall be increased by seven percent
(7%) thereof. This increase shall be calculated before monthly retirement allowances as of July 1, 1977, have been increased to the extent provided for in the preceding subsection (o). The provisions of this subsection shall apply
also to the allowance of a surviving annuitant of a beneficiary.

(aa) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, the increase in allowance to each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1978, which shall become payable on July 1, 1979, as otherwise provided in G.S. 135-5(o), shall be the current maximum four
percent (4%) plus an additional one percent (1%) for the year beginning July 1, 1979. Provisions of this subsection shall apply also to the allowance of a surviving annuitant of a beneficiary.

(bb) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, the increase in allowance to each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1979, which shall become payable on July 1, 1980, as otherwise provided in G.S. 135-5(o), shall be the current maximum four
percent (4%) plus an additional three percent (3%) computed on the retirement allowance prior to any increase authorized by paragraph (cc) of this section. Provisions of this subsection shall apply also to the allowance of
a surviving annuitant of a beneficiary.

(cc) Increases in Benefits to Those Persons Who Were Retired Prior to July 1, 1977. —

From and after July 1, 1980, the monthly benefits to or on account of persons who commenced receiving benefits from the system prior to July 1, 1977, shall be increased by a percentage in accordance with the following schedule:

Click to viewThis increase shall be calculated before monthly retirement allowances, as of July 1, 1980, have been increased for all cost-of-living increases allowed for the same period.

(dd) From and after July 1, 1981, the retirement allowance to or on account of the beneficiaries whose retirement commenced prior to July 1, 1980, shall be increased by three percent (3%). These increases shall be calculated on the basis of the allowance
payable and in effect on June 30, 1980, so as not to compound on the increases otherwise payable under paragraphs (bb), (cc) and (ee) of this section.

(ee) Adjustment in Allowances Paid Beneficiaries Whose Retirement Commenced Prior to July 1, 1980. — From and after July 1, 1981, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced prior to July 1, 1980, shall be adjusted
by an increase of one and three-tenths percent (1.3%). This adjustment shall be calculated on the basis of the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1980, so as not to compound on the increases otherwise payable under
paragraphs (bb), (cc) and (dd) of this section.

(ff) From and after July 1, 1982, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1981, shall be increased by one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1981.

(gg)
From and after July 1, 1983, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1982, shall be increased by two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the allowance payable
on July 1, 1982, provided the increase in retirement allowances shall be payable in accordance with all requirements, stipulations and conditions set forth in subsection (o) of this section, plus an additional one and one-half
percent (1.5%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1982, in order to supplement the increase payable in accordance with subsection (o) of this section.

(hh)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, from and after July 1, 1983, the retirement allowance payable to each teacher and State employee, who retired prior to July 1, 1973, and who is in receipt of
a reduced retirement allowance based upon 30 or more years of contributing membership service, shall be increased by the elimination of the reduction factors applicable at the time of their retirement under

G.S. 135-3(8)

or G.S. 135-5(b3). The provisions of this subsection shall apply equally to the allowance of a surviving annuitant of a beneficiary.

(ii)
From and after July 1, 1984, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1983, shall be increased by three and eight-tenths percent (3.8%) of the allowance
payable on July 1, 1983, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o), plus an additional four and two-tenths percent (4.2%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1983.

(jj)

Increase in Allowance Where Retirement Commenced on or before July 1, 1984, or after that Date, but before June 30, 1985. —
From and after July 1, 1985, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1984, shall be increased by four percent (4%) of the allowance payable on
July 1, 1984, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1985, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1984, but before June 30, 1985, shall
be increased by a prorated amount of four percent (4%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1984, and June 30,
1985.

(kk)

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 1985. —
From and after July 1, 1985, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 1985, shall be increased by six-tenths percent (0.6%) of the allowance payable on June
1, 1985. This allowance shall be calculated on the basis of the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1985, so as not to be compounded on any other increases payable under subsection (o) of this section or otherwise granted
by act of the 1985 Session of the General Assembly.

(
ll
)
From and after July 1, 1986, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1985, shall be increased by three and eight-tenths percent (3.8%) of the allowance
payable on July 1, 1985, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1986, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1985, but before June
30, 1986, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and eight-tenths percent (3.8%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid
between July 1, 1985, and June 30, 1986.

(mm)
From and after July 1, 1987, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1986, shall be increased by four percent (4.0%) of the allowance payable on
July 1, 1986, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1987, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1986, but before June 30, 1987, shall
be increased by a prorated amount of four percent (4.0%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1986, and June 30,
1987.

(nn)
From and after July 1, 1988, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1987, shall be increased by three and six-tenths percent (3.6%) of the allowance
payable on July 1, 1987, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1988, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1987, but before June
30, 1988, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and six-tenths percent (3.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 1987, and June 30, 1988.

(oo)

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 1988. —
From and after July 1, 1988, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 1988, shall be increased by one and two-tenths percent (1.2%) of the allowance payable
on June 1, 1988. This allowance shall be calculated on the basis of the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1988, so as not to be compounded on any other increase payable under subsection (o) of this section or otherwise
granted by act of the 1987 Session of the General Assembly.

(pp)
From and after July 1, 1989, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1988, shall be increased by three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the allowance
payable on July 1, 1988, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1989, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1988, but before June
30, 1989, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 1988, and June 30, 1989.

(qq)

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 1989. —
From and after July 1, 1989, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 1989, shall be increased by one and nine-tenths percent (1.9%) of the allowance payable
on June 1, 1989. This allowance shall be calculated on the basis of the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1989, so as not to be compounded on any other increase payable under subsection (o) of this section or otherwise
granted by act of the 1989 Session of the General Assembly.

(rr)
Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 1990. From and after July 1, 1990, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 1990, shall
be increased by six-tenths of one percent (0.6%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 1990. This allowance shall be calculated on the basis of the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1990, so as not to be compounded
on any other increase granted by act of the 1989 Session of the General Assembly (1990 Regular Session).

(ss)
From and after July 1, 1990, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1989, shall be increased by six and one-tenth percent (6.1%) of the allowance
payable on July 1, 1989, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1990, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1989, but before June
30, 1990, shall be increased by a prorated amount of six and one-tenth percent (6.1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 1989, and June 30, 1990.

(tt)

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 1992. —
From and after July 1, 1992, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 1992, shall be increased by three and six-tenths percent (3.6%) of the allowance payable
on June 1, 1992. This allowance shall be calculated on the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1992, so as not to be compounded on any other increase granted by act of the 1991 Session of the General Assembly, 1992
Regular Session.

(uu)
From and after July 1, 1992, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1991, shall be increased by one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the allowance
payable on July 1, 1991, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1992, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1991, but before June
30, 1992, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 1991 and June 30, 1992.

(vv)

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 1993. —
From and after July 1, 1993, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 1993, shall be increased by six-tenths of one percent (.6%) of the allowance payable
on June 1, 1993. This allowance shall be calculated on the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1993, so as not to be compounded on any other increase granted by act of the 1993 General Assembly.

(ww)
From and after July 1, 1993, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1992, shall be increased by one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the allowance
payable on July 1, 1992, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1993, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1992, but before June
30, 1993, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 1992, and June 30, 1993.

(xx)

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 1994. —
From and after July 1, 1994, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 1994, shall be increased by one and two-tenths of one percent (1.2%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 1994. This allowance shall be calculated on the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1994, so as not to be compounded on any other increase granted by act of the 1993 General Assembly, 1994 Regular
Session.

(yy)
From and after July 1, 1994, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1993, shall be increased by three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the allowance
payable on July 1, 1993, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1994, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1993, but before June